Illinois, session 104th, HB4131.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 9-8.10 and by adding Section 9-8.11 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/9-8.10)7    Sec. 9-8.10. Use of political committee and other 8reporting organization funds. 9    (a) A political committee shall not make expenditures: 10        (1) In violation of any law of the United States or of 11    this State. 12        (2) Clearly in excess of the fair market value of the 13    services, materials, facilities, or other things of value 14    received in exchange. 15        (3) For satisfaction or repayment of any debts other 16    than loans made to the committee or to the public official 17    or candidate on behalf of the committee or repayment of 18    goods and services purchased by the committee under a 19    credit agreement. Nothing in this Section authorizes the 20    use of campaign funds to repay personal loans. The 21    repayments shall be made by check written to the person 22    who made the loan or credit agreement. The terms and 23    conditions of any loan or credit agreement to a committee   HB4131- 2 -LRB104 15478 SPS 28637 b1    shall be set forth in a written agreement, including but 2    not limited to the method and amount of repayment, that 3    shall be executed by the chair or treasurer of the 4    committee at the time of the loan or credit agreement. The 5    loan or agreement shall also set forth the rate of 6    interest for the loan, if any, which may not substantially 7    exceed the prevailing market interest rate at the time the 8    agreement is executed. 9        (4) For the satisfaction or repayment of any debts or 10    for the payment of any expenses relating to a personal 11    residence, except as provided in Section 9-8.11. Campaign 12    funds may not be used as collateral for home mortgages. 13        (5) For clothing or personal laundry expenses, except 14    clothing items rented by the public official or candidate 15    for his or her own use exclusively for a specific 16    campaign-related event, provided that committees may 17    purchase costumes, novelty items, or other accessories 18    worn primarily to advertise the candidacy. 19        (6) For the travel expenses of any person unless the 20    travel is necessary for fulfillment of political, 21    governmental, or public policy duties, activities, or 22    purposes. 23        (7) For membership or club dues charged by 24    organizations, clubs, or facilities that are primarily 25    engaged in providing health, exercise, or recreational 26    services; provided, however, that funds received under   HB4131- 3 -LRB104 15478 SPS 28637 b1    this Article may be used to rent the clubs or facilities 2    for a specific campaign-related event. 3        (8) In payment for anything of value or for 4    reimbursement of any expenditure for which any person has 5    been reimbursed by the State or any person. For purposes 6    of this item (8), a per diem allowance is not a 7    reimbursement. 8        (9) For the lease or purchase of or installment 9    payment for a motor vehicle unless the political committee 10    can demonstrate the vehicle will be used primarily for 11    campaign purposes or for the performance of governmental 12    duties. Nothing in this paragraph prohibits a political 13    committee from using political funds to make expenditures 14    related to vehicles not purchased or leased by a political 15    committee, provided the expenditure relates to the use of 16    the vehicle for primarily campaign purposes or the 17    performance of governmental duties. Persons using vehicles 18    not purchased or leased by a political committee may be 19    reimbursed for actual mileage for the use of the vehicle 20    for campaign purposes or for the performance of 21    governmental duties. The mileage reimbursements shall be 22    made at a rate not to exceed the standard mileage rate 23    method for computation of business expenses under the 24    Internal Revenue Code. 25        (10) Directly for an individual's tuition or other 26    educational expenses, except for governmental or political   HB4131- 4 -LRB104 15478 SPS 28637 b1    purposes directly related to a candidate's or public 2    official's duties and responsibilities. 3        (11) For payments to a public official or candidate or 4    his or her family member unless for compensation for 5    services actually rendered by that person. The provisions 6    of this item (11) do not apply to expenditures by a 7    political committee for expenses related to providing 8    childcare for a minor child or care for a dependent family 9    member if the care is reasonably necessary for the public 10    official or candidate to fulfill political or governmental 11    duties. The provisions of this item (11) do not apply to 12    expenditures by a political committee in an aggregate 13    amount not exceeding the amount of funds reported to and 14    certified by the State Board or county clerk as available 15    as of June 30, 1998, in the semi-annual report of 16    contributions and expenditures filed by the political 17    committee for the period concluding June 30, 1998. 18    (b) The Board shall have the authority to investigate, 19upon receipt of a verified complaint, violations of the 20provisions of this Section. The Board may levy a fine on any 21person who knowingly makes expenditures in violation of this 22Section and on any person who knowingly makes a malicious and 23false accusation of a violation of this Section. The Board may 24act under this subsection only upon the affirmative vote of at 25least 5 of its members. The fine shall not exceed $500 for each 26expenditure of $500 or less and shall not exceed the amount of   HB4131- 5 -LRB104 15478 SPS 28637 b1the expenditure plus $500 for each expenditure greater than 2$500. The Board shall also have the authority to render 3rulings and issue opinions relating to compliance with this 4Section. 5    (c) Nothing in this Section prohibits the expenditure of 6funds of a political committee controlled by an officeholder 7or by a candidate to defray the customary and reasonable 8expenses of an officeholder in connection with the performance 9of governmental and public service functions. 10    (d) Nothing in this Section prohibits the funds of a 11political committee which is controlled by a person convicted 12of a violation of any of the offenses listed in subsection (a) 13of Section 10 of the Public Corruption Profit Forfeiture Act 14from being forfeited to the State under Section 15 of the 15Public Corruption Profit Forfeiture Act. 16(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.) 17    (10 ILCS 5/9-8.11 new)18    Sec. 9-8.11. Use of funds for security purposes. A 19political committee may make expenditures to provide for 20personal security services and security enhancements to a 21candidate's personal home or office, including, but not 22limited to, security systems, cameras, walls, fences, or other 23physical structures, if the expenditures are reasonably 24related to protecting the candidate from harm. This Section 25applies to all expenditures made by a political committee   HB4131- 6 -LRB104 15478 SPS 28637 b1after the 2024 general election.